Wyoming statutes. Title 18 Counties
Article 2. Assessors

Cross references. —

For provision that no county assessor shall be appointed deputy sheriff, see §

18-3-602

.

For constitutional provisions that legislature shall designate county officers and fix salaries of county officers, see art. 14, § 3, Wyo. Const.

As to taxation and property generally, see art. 15, §§ 1 to 16, Wyo. Const.

For duty of county assessor as to assessment of tax made from maintaining nuisance, see §

6-6-207

.

As to filling of vacancy in office of county assessor, see §

22-18-111

.

For duty of county assessor as to tax levy in special cemetery districts, see §

35-8-314

.

For duty of county commissioners and county assessor as to tax levy in connection with fire protection districts, see §

35-9-203

.

As to duty of county assessor with reference to assessments made in connection with power districts, see §

37-7-121

.

For duties of county assessor in relation to taxation and revenue generally, see title 39.

For duties of county assessors in relation to water conservancy districts, irrigation districts, etc., generally, see title 41.

§ 18-3-201.
Qualifications; certification and education.

There shall be elected in each county a county assessor as provided by the Wyoming Election Code of 1973 as amended, who shall be a qualified elector and own real property in the county in which he is elected. The county assessor shall be a resident of the county in which the county assessor serves, beginning on the first day of the term and through the last day of the term for which the county assessor serves.

The department of revenue, after consultation with the president of the county assessor’s association, shall:

Establish, implement and maintain a mandatory system of education and training for all property tax appraisers;

Establish standards and criteria for certification;

Provide a temporary and permanent certification program based on education, relevant experience or examination; and

Report excessive absences of any county assessor from required education programs to the appropriate board of county commissioners and to the governor.

As used in this section “property tax appraiser” means any employee of the state or any county, including elected county assessors, who makes valuation judgments used as a basis for ad valorem taxation.

No individual shall perform the duties or exercise the authority of a property tax appraiser unless the person is certified by the department of revenue. No certificate shall be issued to any individual who has not demonstrated to the department of revenue that the individual is competent to perform the necessary work or administer the necessary operation of an assessor’s office. An individual may serve as county assessor without certification for one (1) elected term and the remainder of any unexpired term to which appointed.

The director of the ad valorem tax division, under the direction of the department of revenue, shall provide for examination of applicants for certificates and shall conduct or sponsor in-service or pre-entry training programs on the technical, legal and administrative aspects of the appraisal and assessment process. For this purpose, the director may cooperate with educational institutions, and regional, state or national appraisal and assessing organizations, and shall receive the advice of the president of the county assessor’s association, to develop training programs.

The director, upon appropriation by the legislature, shall also provide for the costs of obtaining and presenting schools including, but not limited to, normal costs of tuition, books and instructor expenses. The direct expenses related to students, such as travel, housing and meals while attending the schools, shall be the direct responsibility of each respective entity.

History.

Laws 1907, ch. 80, § 2; C.S. 1910, § 1260; C.S. 1920, § 1510; R.S. 1931, § 30-301; Laws 1945, ch. 164, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 27-501; W.S. 1957, § 18-94; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 1986, ch. 78, § 1; 1991, ch. 174, § 2; 1995, ch. 209, § 1; 2010, ch. 69, § 203; 2021 ch. 165, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (d), deleted the former last sentence which read: “Individuals occupying the position of county assessor as of the effective date of this act shall be deemed certified until January 1, 1991.”

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, added the second sentence in (a).

Editor's notes. —

Section 2, ch. 164, Laws 1945, reads: “Effective until the first Monday in January of 1947, each county assessor is hereby designated as the person to prepare and keep currently posted, plat books of the real property in his county, the duties connected therewith and those of county assessor being hereby declared compatible; for services connected with such plat books, such assessors shall receive compensation fixed by the board of county commissioners on an annual basis not exceeding $1,000.00 in first and second class counties or in third class counties, $800.00.”

The office of assessor was originally created by ch. 28, C.L. 1876, which was a general law for the organization of county government.

Applicability. —

Laws 2021, ch. 165, § 2, provides: "The residency requirements of this act shall apply to elected or appointed county officers whose terms commence on or after the effective date of this act."

§ 18-3-202.
Oath.

Before entering upon the duties of his office, the county assessor shall take and subscribe the following oath or affirmation: “I,
. . . . .
having been elected assessor of
. . . . .
county, state of Wyoming, do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I will faithfully and impartially perform the duties of assessor of the county of
. . . . . , state of Wyoming, according to law and to the best of my ability, and that I will without fear or favor assess all taxable property within the county of
. . . . . , at its fair value. So help me God”.

History.

Laws 1907, ch. 80, § 5; 1909, ch. 85, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 1263; C.S. 1920, § 1513; R.S. 1931, § 30-304; C.S. 1945, § 27-503; W.S. 1957, § 18-96; Laws 1959, ch. 56, § 2; 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to restrictions upon employment of attorneys under this section, see §

18-3-520

.

As to habeas corpus generally, see §§

1-27-101

to

1-27-134

.

As to appointment of an attorney to prosecute an action of quo warranto when county attorney disabled, see §

1-31-106

.

Stated

in

Scott Realty Co. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 395 P.2d 289,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(Wyo. 1964).

Cited

in

Ketcham v. State, 618 P.2d 1356,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 320

(Wyo. 1980).

§ 18-3-203.
Supplies.

The county assessor shall be furnished with books, assessment roll, stationery and supplies as necessary for the proper discharge of his duties.

History.

Laws 1907, ch. 80, § 6; C.S. 1910, § 1264; C.S. 1920, § 1514; R.S. 1931, § 30-305; C.S. 1945, § 27-504; W.S. 1957, § 18-97; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

Cross references. —

For duty of county commissioners to provide county officers with stationery and supplies, see §

18-3-514

.

Applied

in

Ketcham v. State, 618 P.2d 1356,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 320

(Wyo. 1980).

§ 18-3-204.
Duties generally.

Each county assessor shall:

Keep his office open during the usual business hours with the exception of the time he is away in the performance of his duties making assessments and listing property for the purpose of taxation;

Secure data concerning the listing and taxation of property within his county and gather data from public records and other sources as will enable him to assess all property at its fair value;

Examine the county records relating to transfers of property and gather from all reliable sources information of the changes of ownership of property, and record transfers of property to enable him to assess all property to its rightful owner or owners;

Gather information relating to land passing from the government of the United States into private ownership under the public land laws of the United States, and make records to enable him to list and assess such property to the owner or owners thereof;

When he is not making the assessment for the current year, devote himself to a study of property valuations in his county, and he may subpoena witnesses, administer oaths, examine them under oath, and require certified copies of any part of any public records or documents within his county necessary during the course of such investigation. Whenever any subpoena is issued by the county assessor, it shall be served by the county sheriff without charge to the county. Any witness or person subpoenaed by the county assessor shall receive the same fees as allowed in civil actions;

Prepare the assessment schedule in duplicate and leave with the property owner or person having control of the taxable property a copy of the assessment schedule. If any changes are subsequently made to the assessment schedule by the county assessor or his deputies, the county assessor shall immediately notify the property owner or person having control of the taxable property of the change;

After the county board of equalization has finished their equalization of property for taxation and corrections have been designated by them, complete the roll and make the corrections and changes designated by the board, correctly foot the roll, and when completed subscribe and make the following oath which shall be attached to the roll: “I, . . . . . , county assessor within and for the county of . . . . . , state of Wyoming, do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I or my deputies have demanded, received and reviewed from every property owner or person having control of taxable property within the county of . . . . . , State of Wyoming, a complete and detailed statement of the amount and fair value of all taxable property and that I or my deputies have viewed the property listed, and have revised and corrected the statements where necessary; and that I have to the best of my knowledge and ability valued the property at its fair value; and in no case have I or my deputies knowingly omitted to demand a statement of the description and value of property in the county, and that I have not knowingly omitted to perform any duty required by me by law, and have not connived at any evasion or violation of any requirements of law in relation to the listing and valuation of property. So help me God.”;

Immediately after the taxes are levied each year make the tax list in tabular form and in alphabetical order upon the form and in the manner prescribed by law;

Faithfully and diligently follow and apply the orders, procedures and formulae of the department of revenue or orders of the state board of equalization for the appraisal and assessment of all taxable property;

Attend continuing education programs not to exceed forty (40) classroom hours per year provided by or approved by the department of revenue.

History.

Laws 1907, ch. 80, § 7; 1909, ch. 85, §§ 2, 7; C.S. 1910, §§ 1265, 1275; Laws 1915, ch. 47, §§ 1, 2; C.S. 1920, §§ 1515, 1526, 1527; Laws 1931, ch. 73, § 18; R.S. 1931, §§ 30-306, 30-318, 30-319; C.S. 1945, §§ 27-505, 27-510, 27-511; W.S. 1957, §§ 18-98, 18-103, 18-104; Laws 1959, ch. 56, § 3; 1977, ch. 45, § 4; ch. 124, §§ 1, 4; 1985, ch. 148, § 1; 1995, ch. 209, § 1.

Cross references. —

For duty of county assessors to collect agricultural statistics, see chapter 3 of title 11.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Assessment in name of true owner. —

In absence of statute to contrary, real property must be assessed for taxation in name of true owner, if known. McCarthy v. Union Pac. R.R., 58 Wyo. 308, 131 P.2d 326,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1942).

Where person named Michael S. “Madden” was record owner of land, assessment thereof in name of “Madden Bros.” pursuant thereto, must be held void. McCarthy v. Union Pac. R.R., 58 Wyo. 308, 131 P.2d 326,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1942).

Owner of record. —

Term “owner” so far as real estate is concerned, means owner of record. McCarthy v. Union Pac. R.R., 58 Wyo. 308, 131 P.2d 326,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1942).

Subsequent parties in interest. —

Requirement that assessment of realty be made in name of owner may be invoked also by parties subsequently receiving interest in such property. McCarthy v. Union Pac. R.R., 58 Wyo. 308, 131 P.2d 326,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1942).

Assessor's oath. —

Assessment roll signed by assessor with statutory oath but not taken before an officer authorized to administer oaths, held insufficient to give validity to delinquent tax sale. United States v. Klink, 3 F. Supp. 208, 1933 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 1578 (D. Wyo. 1933).

Assessor's oath, required to be attached to assessment roll, is designed to safeguard taypayers' interests. Brewer v. Kulien, 42 Wyo. 314, 294 P. 777,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 56

(Wyo. 1930).

County assessor's failure to attach oath to assessment roll invalidates tax sale, where title is claimed thereunder. Brewer v. Kulien, 42 Wyo. 314, 294 P. 777,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 56

(Wyo. 1930).

In an action to quiet title to land acquired under tax sale, it was incumbent on the plaintiff to show that assessor's oath was attached to the tax roll before any sale in connection therewith took place, and on a failure to so show the plaintiff could not prevail. Sidlo, Simons, Day & Co. v. Phillips, 48 Wyo. 390, 49 P.2d 243,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 1935), overruled, Texas W. Oil & Gas Corp. v. First Interstate Bank, 743 P.2d 857,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 514

(Wyo. 1987). But see Texas W. Oil & Gas Corp. v. First Interstate Bank, 743 P.2d 857,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 514

(Wyo. 1987), reaff'd, 749 P.2d 278,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1988).

Adding, deducting from valuation. —

Law does not require final valuation of property to be made by assessors at any specified date and they are authorized to add to and deduct from valuations on schedules when they list property for taxation. Corthell v. Board of Comm'rs, 44 Wyo. 71, 8 P.2d 812,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1932).

Tax value of personal property is fair actual cash market value.—

The value of personal property for purposes of taxation should be estimated according to the fair actual cash market value or the price that the property would sell for in cash in the usual course of business. J. Ray McDermott & Co. v. Hudson, 370 P.2d 364,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 77

(Wyo. 1962).

Presumption. —

It must be presumed that when county assessment roll is laid before state board of equalization (now department of revenue and taxation) valuations of various owners have been fully equalized as between themselves. Bunten v. Rock Springs Grazing Ass'n, 29 Wyo. 461, 215 P. 244,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1923).

Action on county assessment roll. —

County assessment roll is not to be sent to state board of equalization (now department of revenue and taxation) until county board has completed all adjustments at its July meeting, and the roll is not complete or final, so as to authorize tax levy, until acted upon by the state board. Baker v. Paxton, 29 Wyo. 500, 215 P. 257,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1923).

Applied

in

Weaver v. State Bd. of Equalization, 511 P.2d 97,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 165

(Wyo. 1973).

Quoted

in

Scott Realty Co. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 395 P.2d 289,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(Wyo. 1964).

Stated

in

Simons v. Laramie County Sch. Dist., 741 P.2d 1116,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 496

(Wyo. 1987).

Law reviews. —

See “Remedies for Defects in General Property Tax Assessments in Wyoming,” 4 Wyo. L.J. 240.

For note, “The Common-Law Rule Against Holding Incompatible Offices — Abolishing the ‘Office’ Limitation,” see IX Land & Water L. Rev. 667 (1974).

§ 18-3-205.
Interfering with assessor; failure to return property; penalties.

Any person interfering with the county assessor or deputy county assessor in the discharge of his duties, or any person refusing to allow the county assessor, deputy county assessor or representative of the department of revenue to examine any property pursuant to W.S. 39-13-103(b)(v), is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction shall be fined not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or imprisoned for not more than six (6) months in jail, or both.

Any person who fails to report taxable property as provided in W.S. 39-13-107(a)(i) may be assessed a civil fee of five dollars ($5.00) for every day the report is not filed, not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00). Civil fees under this subsection shall be added to the assessment for that taxpayer.

History.

Laws 1909, ch. 85, §§ 5, 6; C.S. 1910, §§ 1273, 1274; C.S. 1920, §§ 1524, 1525; R.S. 1931, §§ 30-316, 30-317; C.S. 1945, §§ 27-508, 27-509; W.S. 1957, §§ 18-101, 18-102; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

18-3-206

; Laws 1984, ch. 70, § 1; 1991, ch. 174, § 2; 1995, ch. 209, § 1; 1998, ch. 5, § 2; 2021 ch. 158, § 1, effective January 1, 2022.

The 2021 amendment

, effective January 1, 2022, rewrote (b), which read, "Any person who fails to return any taxable property owned by him or under his control is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be fined not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500.00), imprisoned in the county jail not exceeding ninety (90) days, or both."

Editor's notes. —

Section

18-3-205

, which was enacted by § 1, ch. 124, Laws 1977, and which related to dividing of counties into assessment districts and appointment, etc., of deputy assessors, was repealed pursuant to § 4, ch. 124, Laws 1977. Accordingly, §§

18-3-206

and 18-3-207 have been redesignated as §§

18-3-205

and

18-3-206

, respectively, in order to maintain proper numerical sequence.

Failure of assessor to give notice of addition of property to schedule. —

Where omitted property was subject to taxation, failure of assessor to give notice of the addition of omitted automobile to his schedule, was not error of such fundamental nature as to avoid tax. Corthell v. Board of Comm'rs, 44 Wyo. 71, 8 P.2d 812,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1932).

§ 18-3-206.
Penalties.

Any county assessor who fails to perform the duties provided by W.S.

18-3-201

through

18-3-206

is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be fined not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500.00).

Any county assessor who swears falsely to any oath provided by W.S.

18-3-201

through

18-3-206

is guilty of false swearing.

Any county assessor, deputy assessor or member of any county board of equalization who knowingly and willfully values or equalizes taxable property at other than its fair value is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be fined not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500.00), imprisoned in the county jail not exceeding ninety (90) days or both, and shall forfeit his office.

History.

Laws 1907, ch. 80, § 11; C.S. 1910, § 1271; C.S. 1920, § 1521; R.S. 1931, § 30-312; C.S. 1945, § 27-506; W.S. 1957, § 18-99; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to perjury generally, see §§

6-5-301

and

6-5-302

.

Editor's notes. —

Section 18-3-208, which was enacted by § 1, ch. 124, Laws 1977, and which related to defining “fair value,” was repealed pursuant to § 4, ch. 124, Laws 1977. See also Editor's note to §

18-3-205

.

Stated

in

Simons v. Laramie County Sch. Dist., 741 P.2d 1116,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 496

(Wyo. 1987).